Utah statutes.
76-10-105.   Buying or possessing a cigar, cigarette, electronic cigarette,
or tobacco by a minor -- Penalty -- Compliance officer authority -- Juvenile
court jurisdiction.
(1)  Any 18 year old person who buys or attempts to buy, accepts, or has in
the person's possession any cigar, cigarette, electronic cigarette, or tobacco
in any form is guilty of a class C misdemeanor and subject to:
(a)  a minimum fine or penalty of $60; and
(b)  participation in a court-approved tobacco education program, which may
include a participation fee.
(2)  Any person under the age of 18 who buys or attempts to buy, accepts, or
has in the person's possession any cigar, cigarette, electronic cigarette, or
tobacco in any form is subject to the jurisdiction of the Juvenile Court and:
(a)  a minimum fine or penalty of $60; and
(b)  participation in a court-approved tobacco education program, which may
include a participation fee.
(3)  A compliance officer appointed by a board of education under Section
53A-3-402 may issue citations for violations of this section committed on
school property.  Cited violations shall be reported to the appropriate
juvenile court.
